Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202626-201
Terms; defined.

For purposes of sections 26-201 to 26-207:

(1) Domestic assault offense means any offense under section 28-323;

(2) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section 81-1401;

(3) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section 81-1401;

(4) No-contact period means the period of time that:

(a) Begins when a person is arrested for a domestic assault offense or sexual assault offense; and

(b) Ends at 11:59 p.m. on the third day after the date of such arrest. If such third day is a Saturday, a Sunday, or a day during which the offices of courts of record may be legally closed as provided in section 25-2221, the no-contact period shall end at 11:59 p.m. on the next day on which such offices will be open;

(5) Sexual assault offense means:

(a) A felony violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320, or 28-320.01 or an attempt to commit any such violation; or

(b) Any other felony that involves subjecting or attempting to subject another person to sexual contact or sexual penetration without such person's consent, as such terms are defined in section 28-318; and

(6) Victim means the person alleged to have been the victim of a domestic assault offense or sexual assault offense.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 26.
January 1, 2027